src/morphology/yrk-all.lexc
LEXICON NMN_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ
 SGDATSUF ;
:%^JLoss SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
  PLNOMSUF ;
  PLACCSUF_Zero ; !

LEXICON NMN_ХАНО !!= * @CODE@ 11
	NMN_ХАНО-SG ;
	NMN_ХАНО-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_ХАНО-SG
:а SGDATSUF ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
:%>у SGPROSSUF ;

LEXICON NMN_ХАНО-PL
  PLNOMSUF ;
 PLACCSUF_О ; !
 POSSESSA-PLURAL ;
 POSSESSA-DUAL ;


LEXICON NMN_ТИРЕ  !!= @CODE@ тир: 12 ProsSg -увна
SGDATSUF ;
:а  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
:%>у SGPROSSUF ;
  PLNOMSUF ;
  PLACCSUF_Е ; !
  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!= @CODE@ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
 POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON NMN_ЕД  !!= @CODE@ ед: 13 !!ProsSg -увна /-ювна
!! Yaml: __yed__
:а  SGDATSUF ;
    SG-ACC-STEM ;
    SG-NOM-STEM ;
:%>у SGPROSSUF ;
    PLNOMSUF ;
    PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!= @CODE@ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
 POSSESSA-DUAL_ХАЮН ;

!! !NOMINALS "NMN"
!! !THREE-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEMS
LEXICON    NMN_МАРАӇГЫ
    NMN_МАРАӇГЫ-SG ;
    NMN_МАРАӇГЫ-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_МАРАӇГЫ-SG
 SGDATSUF ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
 SGPROSSUF ;

LEXICON NMN_МАРАӇГЫ-PL
  PLNOMSUF ;
:%^A2I PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!= @CODE@ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
 POSSESSA-DUAL ;



!!

 POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
+Nom: NOMINAL-CONJUGATION ;


LEXICON N_ЯЙ
! мея:мея
+N: NMN_ЯЙ ;

LEXICON NMN_ЯЙ
 SGNOMSUF ;
 SGACCSUF ;
 SGGENSUF ;
 SGDATSUF ;
 SGLOCSUF ;
 SGABLSUF ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
 SGTRASUF ;

 DUNOMSUF ;
 DUACCSUF ;
 DUGENSUF ;

 PLNOMSUF ;
 PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
 PLDATSUF ;
 PLLOCSUF ;
 PLABLSUF ;
! PLTRASUF ;

 POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
+Nom: NOMINAL-CONJUGATION ;


LEXICON N_СЕЛВ
! мея:мея
+N: NMN_СЕЛВ ;

LEXICON NMN_СЕЛВ
 SGNOMSUF ;
 SGACCSUF ;
 SGGENSUF ;
 SGDATSUF ;
 SGLOCSUF ;
 SGABLSUF ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
 SGTRASUF ;

 DUNOMSUF ;
 DUACCSUF ;
 DUGENSUF ;

 PLNOMSUF ;
 PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
 PLDATSUF ;
 PLLOCSUF ;
 PLABLSUF ;
! PLTRASUF ;

 POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
+Nom: NOMINAL-CONJUGATION ;

!LEXICON N-nAI
! SGNOMSUF ;
! SGACCSUF ;
! SGGENSUF ;
! SGDATSUF ;
! SGLOCSUF ;
! SGABLSUF ;
! SGPROSSUF ;
! SGTRASUF ;
!
! DUNOMSUF ;
! DUACCSUF ;
! DUGENSUF ;
!
! PLNOMSUF ;
! PLACCSUF_I ; !
! PLGENSUF_I ; !
! PLDATSUF ;
! PLLOCSUF ;
! PLABLSUF ;
! PLPROSSUF ;
! PLTRASUF ;



 POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
+Nom: NOMINAL-CONJUGATION ;

LEXICON N_ИБЯ
!ибя:ибя
+N: NMN_ИБЯ ;
LEXICON NMN_ИБЯ
 SGNOMSUF ;
 SGACCSUF ;
 SGGENSUF ;
 SGDATSUF ;
 SGLOCSUF ;
 SGABLSUF ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
 SGTRASUF ;

 DUNOMSUF ;
 DUACCSUF ;
 DUGENSUF ;

 PLNOMSUF ;
 PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
 PLDATSUF ;
 PLLOCSUF ;
 PLABLSUF ;
! PLTRASUF ;

 POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
+Nom: NOMINAL-CONJUGATION ;

LEXICON N_ТАСО
+N: NMN_ТАСО ;
LEXICON NMN_ТАСО
 SGNOMSUF ;
 SGACCSUF ;
 SGGENSUF ;
 SGDATSUF ;
 SGLOCSUF ;
 SGABLSUF ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
 SGTRASUF ;

 DUNOMSUF ;
 DUACCSUF ;
 DUGENSUF ;

 PLNOMSUF ;
 PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
 PLDATSUF ;
 PLLOCSUF ;
 PLABLSUF ;
! PLTRASUF ;

 POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
+Nom: NOMINAL-CONJUGATION ;

LEXICON N_Cons
+TYÄ+N: SGNOMSUF ;

LEXICON N_ConsO
!вык:вык
+TYÄ+N: SGNOMSUF ;


LEXICON N_ВАР
! варˮ:вар
+N: NMN_ВАР ;

! Non-nasal glottal stops
!2013-05-22!LEXICON NMN_МЯДО
!2013-05-22! SGNOMSUF ;
!2013-05-22! SGACCSUF ;
!2013-05-22! SGGENSUF ;
!2013-05-22! SGDATSUF ;
!2013-05-22! SGLOCSUF ;
!2013-05-22! SGABLSUF ;
!2013-05-22! SGPROSSUF ;
!2013-05-22! SGTRASUF ;
!2013-05-22!
!2013-05-22! DUNOMSUF ;
!2013-05-22! DUACCSUF ;
!2013-05-22! DUGENSUF ;
!2013-05-22!
!2013-05-22! PLNOMSUF ;
!2013-05-22! PLACCSUF ;
!2013-05-22! PLDATSUF ;
!2013-05-22! PLLOCSUF ;
!2013-05-22! PLABLSUF ;
!2013-05-22! PLTRASUF ;

! POSSESSOR-INDICES ;



!Work required
LEXICON N_ТЭНО 
+N: SGNOMSUF ;
+N: SGACCSUF ;
+N: SGGENSUF ;
+N: SGDATSUF ;
+N: SGLOCSUF ;
+N: SGABLSUF ;
+N: SGPROSSUF ; 
+N: SGTRASUF ;

+N: DUNOMSUF ;
+N: DUACCSUF ;
+N: DUGENSUF ;

+N: PLNOMSUF ;
+N: PLACCSUF ;
+N: PLDATSUF ;
+N: PLLOCSUF ;
+N: PLABLSUF ;
!+N: PLTRASUF ;

+N: POSSESSOR-INDICES ; ! 
+N+Nom: NOMINAL-CONJUGATION ;

LEXICON N-tojo
+TYÄ+N: K ;


LEXICON N-xawo
+N: SGNOMSUF ;
+N:д SGACCSUF ;
+N:д SGGENSUF ;
+N:ˮ SGDATSUF ;
+N:ˮ SGLOCSUF ;
+N:ˮ SGABLSUF ;
+N:ˮ SGPROSSUF ;
+N: SGTRASUF ;

+N: DUNOMSUF ;
+N: DUACCSUF ;
+N: DUGENSUF ;

+N:д PLNOMSUF ;
+N:д PLACCSUF ;
+N: PLDATSUF ;
+N:ˮ PLLOCSUF ;
+N:ˮ PLABLSUF ;
!+N: PLTRASUF ;

+N+Nom: NOMINAL-CONJUGATION ;
+N: POSSESSOR-INDICES ; !


LEXICON N_ЁЛЬЦЕ
! ёльцьʼ:ёльцӇ1
+N: SGNOMSUF ;
+N: SGACCSUF ;
+N: SGGENSUF ;
+N: SGDATSUF ;
+N: SGLOCSUF ;
+N: SGABLSUF ;
+N: SGPROSSUF ;
+N: SGTRASUF ;

+N: PLNOMSUF ;
+N: PLACCSUF ;
+N: PLDATSUF ;
+N: PLLOCSUF ;
+N: PLABLSUF ;
!+N: PLTRASUF ;

+N+Nom: NOMINAL-CONJUGATION ;
+N: POSSESSOR-INDICES ; !

LEXICON N-якэ
 N_ПАНЫ ;

LEXICON N-N
+N: SGNOMSUF ;
+N: SGACCSUF ;

!! The singular accusative stem
LEXICON SG-ACC-STEM
 SGACCSUF ;
 SGGENSUF ;

!LEXICON SG-DAT-STEM
LEXICON SG-NOM-STEM
 SGNOMSUF ;
 SGLOCSUF ;
 SGABLSUF ;
! SGPROSSUF ;
 DUNOMSUF ;
 DUACCSUF ;
 DUGENSUF ;

 PLDATSUF ;
 PLLOCSUF ;
 PLABLSUF ;
 POSSESSOR-INDICES ;
+Nom: NOMINAL-CONJUGATION ;
+Pred+Abs:%>д K ;
PRED-POSSESSA ; ! This is perhaps a derivation
+Car:%>сиˮ K ;
+Equ:%>даремʼ K ; !дремʼ for non-even-syllable stems
+Equ+Lat:%>даревʼ K ; !древʼ for non-even-syllable stems
+Tra:%>ӈэ K ;

LEXICON SGTRASUF ! Not needed any more!
K ;

LEXICON SGNOMSUF
+Sg+Nom: K ;

LEXICON SGACCSUF
+Sg+Acc:%>мʼ K ;

LEXICON SGGENSUF
+Sg+Gen:%>ʼ K ;

LEXICON SGDATSUF
+Sg+Dat:%>нʼ K ;

LEXICON SGLOCSUF
+Sg+Loc:%>х%{ауоэØ%}на K ; !вэсакохона пэдарахана ӈамгэхэна

LEXICON SGLOCSUF_Хна !!= @CODE@ мякна
+Sg+Loc:%>хна K ;

LEXICON SGLOCSUF_Хана !!= @CODE@ серкана
+Sg+Loc:%>хана K ;

LEXICON SGABLSUF
+Sg+Abl:%>х%{ауоэØ%}д K ; !вэсакоход пэдарахад ӈамгэхэд

LEXICON SGPROSSUF
!+Sg+Pros:%>%{увм%}А2на K ; 
+Sg+Pros:%>%{ауоэиыØ%}%{увм%}А2н%{ая%}	K ; !2013-10-28

LEXICON SGPROSSUF_АМНА
!+Sg+Pros:%>амна K ;
+Sg+Pros:%>%{ауоэиыØ%}%{увм%}А2н%{ая%}	K ; !2013-10-28
 POSSESSA-SG-PROS_АМНА ;

! These must be checked
LEXICON DUNOMSUF 
+Du+Nom:%>х%{ауоэØ%}ʼ K ;
!+Du+Nom:%>хʼ K ;

LEXICON DUACCSUF
+Du+Acc:%>х%{ауоэØ%}ʼ K ;
!+Du+Acc:%>хʼ K ;

LEXICON DUGENSUF 
+Du+Gen:%>х%{ауоэØ%}ʼ K ;
!+Du+Gen:%>хʼ K ;

!! Start Plural
LEXICON PLNOMSUF
+Pl+Nom:%>ˮ K ;
! PLTRASUF ;

LEXICON PLACCSUF
+Pl+Acc:%>Ы1 K ; ! We need something to trigger а:и 0:о but retain ы:ы
+Pl+Acc:%>Ы1 PL-ACC_STEM ;

LEXICON PLACCSUF_Minus
:%^VowLoss PL-ACC_STEM ;

LEXICON PLACCSUF_Zero
! This has zero ending
!+Pl+Acc: K ;
 PL-ACC_STEM ;

LEXICON PLACCSUF_I
+Pl+Acc:%>и  K ; !Stem final е а я may change to и.
:%>и PL-ACC_STEM ;

LEXICON PLACCSUF_Е
+Pl+Acc:%>е K ;
:%>е PL-ACC_STEM ;

LEXICON PLACCSUF_Ё
+Pl+Acc:%>ё K ;
:%>ё PL-ACC_STEM ;

LEXICON PLACCSUF_О
!+Pl+Acc:%>о  K ; 
:%>о PL-ACC_STEM ;


!LEXICON PLACCSUF_AO
!+Pl+Acc:  K ; ! The rule "a:o in я" This will be pointed to PLACCSUF_Zero

!! What is assumed on the basis of the plural accusative
LEXICON PL-ACC_STEM
+Pl+Acc:	K	;
+Pl+Gen:%>ˮ	K	;
+Pl+Pros:%>ˮ%{увм%}А2на 	K	; !!= @CODE@ When does this take a vowel хоˮомна

 POSSESSA-PL-NOM ;
+Pl+Acc: POSSESSA-PL-ACC ;
+Pl+Gen:%>ˮ POSSESSA-PL-GEN ;
  POSSESSA-PL-PROS ;
!2013-04-22!+Pl+Pros:ˮмана  POSSESSA-PL-PROS ;



!LEXICON PLGENSUF
!+Pl+Gen:%>Ы1ˮ PL-ACC_STEM ;

!LEXICON PLGENSUF_Glot
!+Pl+Gen:%>ˮ PL-ACC_STEM ;
!+Pl+Gen:%>ˮ K ; 

!LEXICON PLGENSUF_I
!+Pl+Gen:%>и  K ; !Stem final е а я may change to и.

!LEXICON PLGENSUF_О
!+Pl+Gen:%>оˮ PL-ACC_STEM ;
!+Pl+Gen:%>оˮ K ;

!LEXICON PLGENSUF_AO
!+Pl+Acc:%>ё  K ; ! This is not suffix, it should replace stem я. Exception list?

LEXICON PLDATSUF
+Pl+Dat:%>х%{ауоэØ%}ˮ K ;
+Pl+Dat:%>хˮ K ;

LEXICON PLLOCSUF
+Pl+Loc:%>х%{ауоэØ%}ˮна K ;

LEXICON PLABLSUF
+Pl+Abl:%>х%{ауоэØ%}т K ;


LEXICON PLPROSSUF
!+Pl+Pros:%>Ы1ˮмана K ;
+Pl+Pros:%>ˮмна K ;
!+Pl+Pros:%>ˮмана PL-PROS_POSSESSA ;
!+Pl+Pros:%>ˮмна K ; !явоˮмна
+Pl+Pros:%>ˮ%{ауоэиыØ%}%{увм%}н%{ая%}	K ; !2013-10-28


!LEXICON  PLTRASUF
!+Pl+Tra:%>ˮӈэ K ;

!! Possessor Indices
LEXICON POSSESSOR-INDICES

 POSSESSA-SINGULAR ;

LEXICON POSSESSA-SINGULAR
	POSSESSA-SG-NOM ;
	POSSESSA-SG-ACC ;
	POSSESSA-SG-GEN ;
	POSSESSA-SG-DAT ;
	POSSESSA-SG-LOC ;
	POSSESSA-SG-ABL ;
	POSSESSA-SG-PROS ;

LEXICON nouns
ванорˮ:ванор N_ВАР  "verso" ;
вомдарˮ:вомдар N_ВАР  "syy" ;
вылморˮ:вылмор N_ВАР  "pitkäkasvoinen konkonenällä silmät muljollaan" ;
вэˮ:вэС1 N_ТАСО  "ääri" ;
вэсуˮ:вэсуС1 N_ТАСО  "mies" ;
евэйнзьʼ:евэйнзь N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "keittokulho" ;
ембдярˮ:ембдяр N_ВАР  "vaate" ;
ибядярцьʼ:ибядярць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "liimalapio" ;
илнабцьʼ:илнабць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "nostolaite" ;
ицьʼ:иць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "naru risuja varten" ;
лабэˮ:лабэС1 N_ТАСО  "huone" ;
ландарˮ:ландар N_ВАР  "hyytelömäinen massa" ;
лекарˮ:лекар N_ВАР  "lääkäri" ;
либорˮ:либор N_ВАР  "liehureuna" ;
луӈгорˮ:луӈгор N_ВАР  "paisuma" ;
лыӈгарёбцьʼ:лыӈгарёбць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "pakopaikka" ;
маˮ:маС1 N_ТАСО  "povi" ;
мадырˮ:мадыр N_ВАР  "kurttu" ;
манˮ:манС1 N_ТАСО  "pensas" ;
мандалˮ:мандал N_ВАР  "samanlaisten esineiden kokonaisuus" ;
маноӈгобцьʼ:маноӈгобць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "side" ;
матырˮ:матыр N_ВАР  "katkos" ;
мерцямзьʼ:мерцямзь N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "tuulta ennustava esine" ;
мортыˮ:мортыС1 N_ТАСО  "(linnun) pyrstö" ;
муртыˮ:муртыС1 N_ТАСО  "(linnun) pyrstö" ;
мэбцьʼ:мэбць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "sijainti" ;
мэидарˮ:мэидар N_ВАР  "käsittely" ;
надорцьʼ:надорць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "nahanvalmistuslauta" ;
нахарˮ:нахар N_ВАР  "pähkinä" ;
нелацьʼ:нелаць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "höylä" ;
нензимдаӈобцьʼ:нензимдаӈобць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "ohjausväline" ;
ныланабцьʼ:ныланабць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "lepopaikka" ;
няˮмырˮ:няˮмыр N_ВАР  "vieraalle annetava lahja" ;
няльцьʼ:няльць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "räntä" ;
няндерˮ:няндер N_ВАР  "mielipide" ;
нёхолˮ:нёхол N_ВАР  "lika" ;
паклабцьʼ:паклабць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "salpa" ;
палкурˮ:палкур N_ВАР  "siika" ;
паридебцьʼ:паридебць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "pimeys" ;
паӈглярˮ:паӈгляр N_ВАР  "palmikko" ;
петензьʼ:петензь N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "mattopiiska" ;
пирˮ:пир N_ВАР  "koivun jälsi" ;
письʼ:пись N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "nauru" ;
поёларёмбабцьʼ:поёларёмбабць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "riidanaihe" ;
пурˮ:пур N_ВАР  "home" ;
пэтабцьʼ:пэтабць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "kirves" ;
сабарˮ:сабар N_ВАР  "kuoppa" ;
савумдаӈгобцьʼ:савумдаӈгобць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "parannusväline" ;
сакарˮ:сукар N_ВАР  "sokeri" ;
санарˮ:санар N_ВАР  "hyppääjä" ;
саркоˮ:саркоС1 N_ТАСО  "syvä lumisohjo" ;
селв:селв N_СЕЛВ  "hyytynyt veri" ;
серˮ:сер N_ВАР  "asia" ;
сероцьʼ:сероць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "oveluuden syy" ;
сиˮ:сиС1 N_ТАСО  "musta kovakuoriainen" ;
сисьʼ:сись N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "haka" ;
сонпурˮ:сонпур N_ВАР  "latasin" ;
соябцьʼ:соябць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "synnyn määräaika" ;
сэберˮ:сэбер N_ВАР  "sinnikkyys" ;
сэванзьʼ:сэванзь N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "aurinkolasit" ;
сэрˮ:сэр N_ВАР  "jää" ;
сэрерˮ:сэрер N_ВАР  "ikuinen routa" ;
сядобэрцьʼ:сядобэрць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "peili" ;
сяторабцьʼ:сяторабць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "näpistimet" ;
таˮ:таС1 N_ТАСО  "lisuke" ;
табалˮ:табал N_ВАР  "sakka" ;
тадэӈонзьʼ:тадэӈонзь N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "hammastikku" ;
тарабцьʼ:тарабць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "tarve" ;
тасерˮ:тасер N_ВАР  "ähinä" ;
теднорцьʼ:теднорць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "puuhaarukka" ;
толаӈгобцьʼ:толаӈгобць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "pirkka" ;
тондерˮ:тондер N_ВАР  "penger" ;
тохоˮ:тохоС1 N_ТАСО  "kangas" ;
туёцьʼ:туёць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "risti" ;
туӈгоˮ:туӈгоС1 N_ТАСО  "tunguusi" ;
тырморˮ:тырмор N_ВАР  "rosoisuus" ;
тэнуˮ:тэнуС1 N_ТАСО  "toalettipaperi" ;
тэраӈгобцьʼ:тэраӈгобць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "siivilä" ;
тэёлˮ:тэёл N_ВАР  "tuhrija" ;
тярорцьʼ:тярорць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "jaotteluväline" ;
хаˮаврабцьʼ:хаˮаврабць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "laskeusväline" ;
хавˮ:хавС1 N_ТАСО  "" ;
хаˮварˮ:хавар N_ВАР  "ulosteet" ;
хадэˮ:хадэС1 N_ТАСО  "pihka" ;
ханебцьʼ:ханебць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "saalistusväline" ;
харнерˮ:харнер N_ВАР  "vääntymä" ;
хонабцьʼ:хонабць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "makuupaikka" ;
хосарˮ:хосар N_ВАР  "pelikortti" ;
хыберˮ:хыбер N_ВАР  "kalan veri" ;
хыберонзьʼ:хыберонзь N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "väline kalan puhdistukseen verestä" ;
хэвсэрˮ:хэвсэр N_ВАР  "merimetso" ;
юмборˮ:юмбор N_ВАР  "iso ruohomätäs suossa" ;
яˮ:яС1 N_ТАСО  "sysi" ;
яˮ:яС1 N_ТАСО  "karva" ;
ябэˮ:ябэС1 N_ТАСО  "tuulisuoja oven vieressä" ;
явонзьʼ:явонзь N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "merenkäynti" ;
ядхалˮ:ядхал N_ВАР  "luisu" ;
ямзярˮ:ямзяр N_ВАР  "kylmän takia kyyhöttävä ihminen" ;
янутабцьʼ:янутабць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "saalin kolkkauskurikka" ;
яхалтабцьʼ:яхалтабць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "veitsi jolla tehdään reikiä" ;
яёлˮ:яёл N_ВАР  "roska" ;
яӈоˮ:яӈоС1 N_ТАСО  "kerros" ;
ёрцьʼ:ёрць N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "nuotta" ;
ӈонерˮ:ӈонер N_ВАР  "kasa" ;
ӈунзьʼ:ӈунзь N_ЁЛЬЦЕ  "puunhakkuupaikka" ;
ӈутоˮ:ӈутоС1 N_ТАСО  "reki kodan tankoja varten" ;
